HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.aff
FLAG num
SFX 57 0 mäbilsek .
SFX 57 t dibilseňiz .
SFX 57 0 mäbilseňiz .
SFX 57 t dibilseler .
SFX 57 0 mäbilseler .
SFX 57 t dendir .
SFX 57 t deniň .
SFX 57 0 medigiň .
SFX 57 t dýäniň .
SFX 57 0 meýäniň .
SFX 57 0 jegiň .
SFX 57 0 mejegiň .
SFX 57 t dendigim .
SFX 57 t dendigimiň .
SFX 57 t dendigime .
SFX 57 t dendigimi .
SFX 57 t dendigimde .
SFX 57 t dendigimden .
SFX 57 t dendigiň .
SFX 57 t dendigiňiň .
SFX 57 t dendigiňe .
SFX 57 t dendigiňi .
SFX 57 t dendigiňde .
SFX 57 t dendigiňden .
SFX 57 t dendigi .
SFX 57 t dendiginiň .
SFX 57 t dendigine .
SFX 57 t dendigini .
SFX 57 t dendiginde .
SFX 57 t dendiginden .
SFX 57 t dendigimiz .
SFX 57 t dendigimiziň .
SFX 57 t dendigimize .
SFX 57 t dendigimizi .
SFX 57 t dendigimizde .
SFX 57 t dendigimizden .
SFX 57 t dendigiňiz .
SFX 57 t dendigiňiziň .
SFX 57 t dendigiňize .
SFX 57 t dendigiňizi .
SFX 57 t dendigiňizde .
SFX 57 t dendigiňizden .
SFX 57 t dendikleri .
SFX 57 t dendikleriniň .
SFX 57 t dendiklerine .
SFX 57 t dendiklerini .
SFX 57 t dendiklerinde .
SFX 57 t dendiklerinden .
SFX 57 0 mändigim .
SFX 57 0 mändigimiň .
SFX 57 0 mändigime .
SFX 57 0 mändigimi .
SFX 57 0 mändigimde .
SFX 57 0 mändigimden .
SFX 57 0 mändigiň .
SFX 57 0 mändigiňiň .
SFX 57 0 mändigiňe .
SFX 57 0 mändigiňi .
SFX 57 0 mändigiňde .
SFX 57 0 mändigiňden .
SFX 57 0 mändigi .
SFX 57 0 mändiginiň .
SFX 57 0 mändigine .
SFX 57 0 mändigini .
SFX 57 0 mändiginde .
SFX 57 0 mändiginden .
SFX 57 0 mändigimiz .
SFX 57 0 mändigimiziň .
SFX 57 0 mändigimize .
SFX 57 0 mändigimizi .
SFX 57 0 mändigimizde .
SFX 57 0 mändigimizden .
SFX 57 0 mändigiňiz .
SFX 57 0 mändigiňiziň .
SFX 57 0 mändigiňize .
SFX 57 0 mändigiňizi .
SFX 57 0 mändigiňizde .
SFX 57 0 mändigiňizden .
SFX 57 0 mändikleri .
SFX 57 0 mändikleriniň .
SFX 57 0 mändiklerine .
SFX 57 0 mändiklerini .
SFX 57 0 mändiklerinde .
SFX 57 0 mändiklerinden .
SFX 57 t dýändigim .
SFX 57 t dýändigimiň .
SFX 57 t dýändigime .
SFX 57 t dýändigimi .
SFX 57 t dýändigimde .
SFX 57 t dýändigimden .
SFX 57 t dýändigiň .
SFX 57 t dýändigiňiň .
SFX 57 t dýändigiňe .
SFX 57 t dýändigiňi .
SFX 57 t dýändigiňde .
SFX 57 t dýändigiňden .
SFX 57 t dýändigi .
SFX 57 t dýändiginiň .
SFX 57 t dýändigine .
SFX 57 t dýändigini .
SFX 57 t dýändiginde .
SFX 57 t dýändiginden .
SFX 57 t dýändigimiz .
SFX 57 t dýändigimiziň .
SFX 57 t dýändigimize .
SFX 57 t dýändigimizi .
SFX 57 t dýändigimizde .
SFX 57 t dýändigimizden .
SFX 57 t dýändigiňiz .
SFX 57 t dýändigiňiziň .
SFX 57 t dýändigiňize .
SFX 57 t dýändigiňizi .
SFX 57 t dýändigiňizde .
SFX 57 t dýändigiňizden .
SFX 57 t dýändikleri .
SFX 57 t dýändikleriniň .
SFX 57 t dýändiklerine .
SFX 57 t dýändiklerini .
SFX 57 t dýändiklerinde .
SFX 57 t dýändiklerinden .
SFX 57 0 meýändigim .
SFX 57 0 meýändigimiň .
SFX 57 0 meýändigime .
SFX 57 0 meýändigimi .
SFX 57 0 meýändigimde .
SFX 57 0 meýändigimden .
SFX 57 0 meýändigiň .
SFX 57 0 meýändigiňiň .
SFX 57 0 meýändigiňe .
SFX 57 0 meýändigiňi .
SFX 57 0 meýändigiňde .
SFX 57 0 meýändigiňden .
SFX 57 0 meýändigi .
SFX 57 0 meýändiginiň .
SFX 57 0 meýändigine .
SFX 57 0 meýändigini .
SFX 57 0 meýändiginde .
SFX 57 0 meýändiginden .
SFX 57 0 meýändigimiz .
SFX 57 0 meýändigimiziň .
SFX 57 0 meýändigimize .
SFX 57 0 meýändigimizi .
SFX 57 0 meýändigimizde .
SFX 57 0 meýändigimizden .
SFX 57 0 meýändigiňiz .
SFX 57 0 meýändigiňiziň .
SFX 57 0 meýändigiňize .
SFX 57 0 meýändigiňizi .
SFX 57 0 meýändigiňizde .
SFX 57 0 meýändigiňizden .
SFX 57 0 meýändikleri .
SFX 57 0 meýändikleriniň .
SFX 57 0 meýändiklerine .
SFX 57 0 meýändiklerini .
SFX 57 0 meýändiklerinde .
SFX 57 0 meýändiklerinden .
SFX 57 0 jekdigim .
SFX 57 0 jekdigimiň .
SFX 57 0 jekdigime .
SFX 57 0 jekdigimi .
SFX 57 0 jekdigimde .
SFX 57 0 jekdigimden .
SFX 57 0 jekdigiň .
SFX 57 0 jekdigiňiň .
SFX 57 0 jekdigiňe .
SFX 57 0 jekdigiňi .
SFX 57 0 jekdigiňde .
SFX 57 0 jekdigiňden .
SFX 57 0 jekdigi .
SFX 57 0 jekdiginiň .
SFX 57 0 jekdigine .
SFX 57 0 jekdigini .
SFX 57 0 jekdiginde .
SFX 57 0 jekdiginden .
SFX 57 0 jekdigimiz .
SFX 57 0 jekdigimiziň .
SFX 57 0 jekdigimize .
SFX 57 0 jekdigimizi .
SFX 57 0 jekdigimizde .
SFX 57 0 jekdigimizden .
SFX 57 0 jekdigiňiz .
SFX 57 0 jekdigiňiziň .
SFX 57 0 jekdigiňize .
SFX 57 0 jekdigiňizi .
SFX 57 0 jekdigiňizde .
SFX 57 0 jekdigiňizden .
SFX 57 0 jekdikleri .
SFX 57 0 jekdikleriniň .
SFX 57 0 jekdiklerine .
SFX 57 0 jekdiklerini .
SFX 57 0 jekdiklerinde .
SFX 57 0 jekdiklerinden .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigim .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigimiň .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigime .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigimi .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigimde .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigimden .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigiň .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigiňiň .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigiňe .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigiňi .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigiňde .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigiňden .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigi .
SFX 57 0 mejekdiginiň .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigine .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigini .
SFX 57 0 mejekdiginde .
SFX 57 0 mejekdiginden .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigimiz .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigimiziň .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigimize .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigimizi .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigimizde .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigimizden .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigiňiz .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigiňiziň .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigiňize .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigiňizi .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigiňizde .
SFX 57 0 mejekdigiňizden .
SFX 57 0 mejekdikleri .
SFX 57 0 mejekdikleriniň .
SFX 57 0 mejekdiklerine .
SFX 57 0 mejekdiklerini .
SFX 57 0 mejekdiklerinde .
SFX 57 0 mejekdiklerinden .
SFX 57 t denler .
SFX 57 t denleriň .
SFX 57 t denlere .
SFX 57 t denleri .
SFX 57 t denlerde .
SFX 57 t denlerden .
SFX 57 0 medikler .
SFX 57 0 medikleriň .
SFX 57 0 mediklere .
SFX 57 0 medikleri .
SFX 57 0 mediklerde .
SFX 57 0 mediklerden .
SFX 57 t dýänler .
SFX 57 t dýänleriň .
SFX 57 t dýänlere .
SFX 57 t dýänleri .
SFX 57 t dýänlerde .
SFX 57 t dýänlerden .
SFX 57 0 meýänler .
SFX 57 0 meýänleriň .
SFX 57 0 meýänlere .
SFX 57 0 meýänleri .
SFX 57 0 meýänlerde .
SFX 57 0 meýänlerden .
SFX 57 0 jekler .
SFX 57 0 jekleriň .
SFX 57 0 jeklere .
SFX 57 0 jekleri .
SFX 57 0 jeklerde .
SFX 57 0 jeklerden .
SFX 57 0 mejekler .
SFX 57 0 mejekleriň .
SFX 57 0 mejeklere .
SFX 57 0 mejekleri .
SFX 57 0 mejeklerde .
SFX 57 0 mejeklerden .
SFX 57 t dipdim .
SFX 57 0 mändim .
SFX 57 t dipdiň .
SFX 57 0 mändiň .
SFX 57 t dipdi .
SFX 57 0 mändi .
SFX 57 t dipdik .
SFX 57 0 mändik .
SFX 57 t dipdiňiz .
SFX 57 0 mändiňiz .
SFX 57 t dipdiler .
SFX 57 0 mändiler .
SFX 57 t dýärdim .
SFX 57 0 meýärdim .
SFX 57 t dýärdiň .
SFX 57 0 meýärdiň .
SFX 57 t dýärdi .
SFX 57 0 meýärdi .
SFX 57 t dýärdik .
SFX 57 0 meýärdik .
SFX 57 t dýärdiňiz .
SFX 57 0 meýärdiňiz .
SFX 57 t dýärdiler .
SFX 57 0 meýärdiler .
SFX 57 0 jekdim .
SFX 57 0 jekdiň .
SFX 57 0 jekdi .
SFX 57 0 jekdik .
SFX 57 0 jekdiňiz .
SFX 57 0 jekdiler .
SFX 57 t den .
SFX 57 t deniň .
SFX 57 t dene .
SFX 57 t deni .
SFX 57 t dende .
SFX 57 t denden .
SFX 57 t denleri .
SFX 57 t denleriniň .
SFX 57 t denlerine .
SFX 57 t denlerini .
SFX 57 t denlerinde .
SFX 57 t denlerinden .
