HunspellVBATests/lang/tk-TM.dic
bejert/57
bekelt/57
beket/57
beklet/57
belgilet/57
berkit/57
berklet/57
beslet/57
beterlet/57
beýgelt/57
beýt/57
bezet/57
bişirt/57
bögürt/57
böleklet/57
böwetlet/57
büdret/57
büküt/57
çekelet/57
çemmerlet/57
çeňklet/57
çermet/57
çerrelt/57
çeýnet/57
çäşert/57
çigitlet/57
çigreklet/57
çintget/57
çirkizt/57
çişirt/57
çökert/57
çömmelt/57
çöplet/57
çöşlet/57
çöwjet/57
çöwürt/57
çümmüklet/57
çürelt/57
çürket/57
çüýlet/57
çüýret/57
debset/57
debsilet/57
degşirt/57
delmirt/57
demlet/57
deňlet/57
depelet/57
depgilet/57
depjet/57
derjiret/57
derlet/57
derňet/57
derslet/57
dertlet/57
desselet/57
däbşeklet/57
däbşeneklet/57
däliret/57
digdeneklet/57
dikelt/57
dikgirdet/57
dilimlet/57
diňlet/57
direlt/57
diret/57
dişet/57
dişlet/57
dökünlet/57
döret/57
dörjet/57
dükürdet/57
dümewlet/57
düňküldet/57
düňňürdet/57
düşet/57
düşürt/57
düýrlet/57
düýt/57
düzelt/57
düzet/57
egirt/57
egrelt/57
egşit/57
ejizlet/57
eklet/57
eleslet/57
elet/57
eljiret/57
ellet/57
emedeklet/57
emlet/57
endiret/57
entet/57
entret/57
eňret/57
eňşet/57
eplet/57
erejeklet/57
eret/57
eset/57
eşiklet/57
eşit/57
etdirt/57
et/57
eýelet/57
eýerlet/57
eýert/57
eýgert/57
eýlet/57
äbert/57
ädimlet/57
äkelt/57
äkit/57
äňet/57
ät/57
geçirt/57
gemirt/57
geplet/57
getirt/57
gäbert/57
gät/57
gäzlet/57
giňelt/57
girit/57
git/57
gizlet/57
göndert/57
gönelt/57
götert/57
götinlet/57
göwnet/57
gözet/57
gözlet/57
gübert/57
gübürdet/57
güžžüldet/57
güllet/57
gümpüldet/57
güpbert/57
güplet/57
güpürdet/57
gürelt/57
gürlet/57
gürpüldet/57
gürrüldet/57
gürsüldet/57
güsürdet/57
gütlet/57
gütürdet/57
güýürdet/57
güzlet/57
güzürdet/57
heçjiklet/57
hekgert/57
heklet/57
heläklet/57
heňkirt/57
heňlet/57
herrelt/57
häzirlet/57
hikirdet/57
höltüldet/57
hüžžert/57
hümlet/57
hümürdet/57
hütlet/57
hütürdet/57
hüwjert/57
ibert/57
idet/57
idirdet/57
ieneklet/57
igelet/57
iglet/57
ikilet/57
ikirjiňlet/57
ilerlet/57
iltet/57
inçelt/57
indert/57
indirt/57
iňlet/57
iriňlet/57
işlet/57
iteklet/57
itelet/57
jemlet/57
jerrelt/57
jägildet/57
jäheklet/57
jiltlet/57
jülpüldet/57
jürlet/57
jürrüldet/57
kebşirlet/57
kelemenlet/57
keleplet/57
kellekilet/57
keltelt/57
kemelt/57
kempert/57
kemsit/57
kemşert/57
kepet/57
kerçelet/57
keseklet/57
kesellet/57
kesmeklet/57
keşdelet/57
keýert/57
keýkert/57
keýşert/57
känelt/57
käselet/57
kätmenlet/57
käýit/57
kibirdet/57
kiçelt/57
kiltlet/57
kirlet/57
kişňet/57
kitirdet/57
köjet/57
kökelt/57
kökenlet/57
kökert/57
köklet/57
kölegelet/57
könelt/57
köpelt/57
köpet/57
köpret/57
köpüklet/57
köpürjiklet/57
köret/57
köset/57
köşet/57
köteklet/57
köwlet/57
köwzet/57
küdelet/57
küjület/57
küket/57
külterlet/57
külüňlet/57
kümşüldet/57
kürşert/57
kütelt/57
küýkert/57
küýset/57
leňkildet/57
lägirt/57
läliksiret/57
läşert/57
meňzet/57
meselt/57
meýmiret/57
mälet/57
möhürlet/57
mölert/57
möwjet/57
müňküldet/57
mürrelt/57
mürşert/57
müýnürget/57
müzzert/57
nemjiret/57
nemlet/57
nät/57
öçürt/57
ödet/57
öget/57
ökdelet/57
ölçert/57
ölçet/57
öldürt/57
öljert/57
öňürdiklet/57
öňürt/57
ördürt/57
örklet/57
ötägit/57
öwelt/57
öwret/57
öwürt/57
öýert/57
öýkelet/57
özgert/57
pelpellet/57
pelteklet/57
penjelet/57
perdelet/57
peselet/57
peselt/57
peşet/57
petdelet/57
petiklet/57
petlelet/57
petlet/57
petret/57
peýlet/57
pezzert/57
pilislet/57
pişeklet/57
pitiklet/57
pökgert/57
pöklet/57
pökret/57
pösürdet/57
pötlet/57
pöwhüldet/57
pöwlet/57
pürdet/57
pürepürlet/57
pürrelet/57
rejelet/57
rendelet/57
reňklet/57
sebset/57
selçeňlet/57
seljert/57
selkildet/57
selpet/57
sementlet/57
semret/57
seňkildet/57
seňselet/57
seplet/57
seret/57
sermet/57
serrelt/57
seýiklet/57
seýislet/57
seýreklet/57
säpjet/57
siltet/57
simlet/57
sinklet/57
sömelt/57
sözlet/57
sübselet/57
südürlet/57
süllert/57
sülmüret/57
sülpüldet/57
süpürt/57
sürgüçlet/57
sürmelet/57
süsňet/57
süsseneklet/57
süýjelt/57
süýjet/57
süýrelt/57
süýret/57
süýşürt/57
süzgeklet/57
şeýt/57
şildiret/57
şinelet/57
şüdügärlet/57
tebitlet/57
tebsiret/57
tekizlet/57
telkert/57
tellet/57
temmelet/57
tentet/57
tentireklet/57
terbiýelet/57
terekelet/57
terpet/57
tämizlet/57
täzelet/57
tigirlet/57
tikeneklet/57
tiňňirdet/57
tirket/57
titret/57
tölet/57
törpület/57
tükellet/57
tüket/57
tükgert/57
tüňňert/57
tüpeňlet/57
tüsselet/57
tütet/57
tüýjert/57
tüýküliklet/57
tüýkürt/57
ülpüldet/57
ümezlet/57
ümüt/57
ürçet/57
üsgürt/57
üşert/57
üşet/57
üşüt/57
ütüklet/57
üwet/57
üwret/57
üýşürt/57
üýtget/57
wägirt/57
ýegşert/57
ýekelet/57
ýekesiret/57
ýelejiret/57
ýelimlet/57
ýelinselet/57
ýelmet/57
ýelpeselet/57
ýemirt/57
ýemşert/57
ýeňillet/57
ýeňlet/57
ýerlet/57
ýigdelt/57
ýitelt/57
ýöňelt/57
ýöret/57
ýörmet/57
ýüklet/57
ýüwürt/57
zeňlet/57
zeýlet/57
zäherlet/57
zäklet/57
ziňkildet/57
zömmert/57
zörlet/57
